Wisconsin, session 2025, SB514.
do enact as follows:SB514,13Section 1. 6.20 of the statutes is amended to read:SB514,2,246.20 Absent electors. Any qualified elector of this state who registers, and 1any individual who preregisters under s. 6.31 and will be at least 18 years of age on 2election day, may vote by absentee ballot under ss. 6.84 to 6.89.SB514,23Section 2. 6.31 of the statutes is created to read:SB514,2,646.31 Preregistration. An individual who is an eligible elector under s. 6.02, 5except that he or she is age 16 or 17, may preregister to vote by any registration 6method provided in s. 6.30.SB514,37Section 3. 6.36 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB514,3,286.36 (2) (a) Except as provided in par. pars. (b) and (d), each registration list 9prepared for use as a poll list at a polling place or for purposes of canvassing 10absentee ballots at an election shall contain the full name and address of each 11registered elector; a blank column for the entry of the serial number of the electors 12when they vote or the poll list number used by the municipal board of absentee 13ballot canvassers in canvassing absentee ballots; an indication next to the name of 14each elector for whom proof of residence under s. 6.34 is required; a space for entry 15of the type of and the name of the entity or institution that issued the identifying 16document submitted by the elector as proof of residence when proof of residence 17under s. 6.34 is required; a space for entry of the elector’s signature, or if another 18person signed the elector’s registration form for the elector by reason of the elector’s 19physical disability, the word “exempt”; and a form of certificate bearing the 20certification of the commission administrator stating that the list is a true and 21complete registration list of the municipality or the ward or wards for which the list 22is prepared. The commission shall, by rule, prescribe the space and location for 23entry of each elector’s signature on the poll list which shall provide for entry of the 1signature without changing the orientation of the poll list from the orientation used 2by the election officials.SB514,43Section 4. 6.36 (2) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB514,3,646.36 (2) (d) The registration list under this subsection may not contain the 5name of an individual who preregistered under s. 6.31 unless he or she will be at 6least 18 years of age on election day.SB514,3,77